hu_HU.aff
SFX M   0    ök           [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödül         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödön         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéül        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéért       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödévé        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödével       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödétõl       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödét         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödérõl       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödért        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödére        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödénél       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödének       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödén         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékül       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékön       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékéül      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékéért     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékévé      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékével     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékétõl     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékét       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékérõl     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékért      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékére      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékénél     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékének     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékén       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékéig      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékéhöz     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékébõl     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékében     [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékébe      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéké        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéktõl      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékrõl      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékre       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéknél      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéknek      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékké       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékkel      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékig       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékhöz      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéket       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékbõl      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékben      [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödékbe       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödék         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéig        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödéhöz       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödébõl       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödében       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödébe        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödé          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödtõl        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödrõl        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödre         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödnél        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödnek        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödként       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödkor        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödig         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödhöz        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödet         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    öddé         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    öddel        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödbõl        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödben        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ödbe         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    öd           [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékül         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékön         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékéül        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékéért       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékévé        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékével       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékétõl       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékét         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékérõl       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékért        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékére        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékénél       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékének       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékén         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékéig        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékéhöz       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékébõl       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékében       [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékébe        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    éké          [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    éktõl        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékrõl        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékre         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    éknél        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    éknek        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékké         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékkel        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékig         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékhöz        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    éket         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékbõl        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékben        [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    ékbe         [^eiouáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    t            [ilnruxzáéíóõöúûü]
SFX M   0    t            [aeiuáéíóõöúûü]j
SFX M   0    t            [aeiouáéíóõöúûü]zs
SFX M   0    t            [aeiouáéíóõöúûü][^g]y
SFX M   0    t            [^cz]s
