hu_HU.dic
üvöltethetõ/CDHWRMX
ütemeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
üresfejû/CDHWRM
ülepedõ/CDHWRMXY
ügyeskedtethetõ/CDHWRMX
üdvözlõ/CDHWRMCDHMWXRY
özvegyülõ/CDHWRMXY
ösztönös/CWMmTYcDBDGVNMT
összegöngyölgetõ/CDHWRMXY
örökölhetõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMX
öregbülõ/CDHWRMXY
öntözgettetõ/CDHWRMXY
önbecsülõ/CDHWRM
öltöny/CWMmTYcD
öldöshetõ/CDHWRMX
öklelhetõ/CDHWRMX
õszítendõ/CDHWRMX
õrizhetõ/CDHWRMX
ízetlenkedõ/CDHWRMXY
ígérhetõ/CDHWRMX
észrevevõdtethetõ/CDHWRMX
érzéstelenítendõ/CDHWRMX
érvényesülõ/CDHWRMXY
érthetõ/CDHWRMX
értekezõdendõ/CDHWRMX
éreztettethetõ/CDHWRMX
érdemelendõ/CDHWRMX
énekeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
élvezõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
élethû/CDHWRM
éldegélõ/CDHWRMXY
ékesíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
édesítõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
átíveltetõ/CDHWRMXY
átmérõ/CWMRmYcD
árverezhetõ/CDHWRMX
Üskö/CWMR
Õmezõ/CWMR
zötyögtettetõ/CDHWRMXY
zörgetendõ/CDHWRMX
zöldelltethetõ/CDHWRMX
zsúptetõ/CWMRymYcD
zsigerelhetõ/CDHWRMX
zenésíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
völgyelõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
vízkieresztõ/CWMRymYcD
vésõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
vérezendõ/CDHWRMX
véleményezendõ/CDHWRMX
végigböngészõ/CDHWRMXY
védekezhetõ/CDHWRMX
vizesítõ/CDHWRMXY
viszontszerethetõ/CDHWRMX
villásreggelizendõ/CDHWRMX
vezetõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXYCDHWRM
vetélkedõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
veszõdõ/CDHWRMXY
veszejtõ/CDHWRMXY
versengetendõ/CDHWRMX
verejtékeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
vehetõ/CDHWRMX
vastagbõrû/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
utánvételezendõ/CDHWRMX
tüsténkedõ/CDHWRMXY
tülköltetõ/CDHWRMXY
tûzendõ/CDHWRMX
túlmenõ/CDHWRM
törölközendõ/CDHWRMX
törvénykezõ/CDHWRMXY
törköly/CWMmTYcD
töppeszthetõ/CDHWRMX
tömöríthetõ/CDHWRMX
tömendõ/CDHWRMX
tökéletesítõ/CDHWRMXY
többférjû/CDHWRM
tévesztetõ/CDHWRMXY
térfogatmérõ/CWMRymYcD
tépelõdõ/CDHWRMXY
tánccipõ/CWMRymYcD
trébelhetõ/CDHWRMX
tisztesfû/CWYcCWMRmYcD
tetõztethetõ/CDHWRMX
tetszelegõ/CDHWRMXY
tessékelhetõ/CDHWRMX
terpesztethetõ/CDHWRMX
termesztendõ/CDHWRMX
terhelõdhetõ/CDHWRMX
teregetõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
tentikéltetõ/CDHWRMXY
teljesülõ/CDHWRMXY
telekkönyvezhetõ/CDHWRMX
tekergõzõ/CDHWRMXY
tehermentesítõ/CDHWRMXY
sütögetendõ/CDHWRMX
süppesztetõ/CDHWRMXY
süketültethetõ/CDHWRMX
sötétülõ/CDHWRMXY
söprögetõ/CDHWRMXY
sértendõ/CDHWRMCDHMWR
szüremlõ/CDHWRMXY
szülemlõ/CDHWRMXY
szûkítendõ/CDHWRMX
szöszölendõ/CDHWRMX
szökõ/CDHWRMXY
szõrözendõ/CDHWRMX
szívleltetõ/CDHWRMXY
színesíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
szélfû/CWYcCWMRmYcD
székeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
szédelegtethetõ/CDHWRMX
szájhõsködõ/CDHWRMXY
szikraköz/CWMymTYcD
szervizeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
szeretgetõ/CDHWRMXY
szerelhetõ/CDHWRMX
szentségelõ/CDHWRMXY
szenesíthetõ/CDHWRMX
szemrevételezõ/CDHWRMXY
szemerkélõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
szelídíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
szelethetõ/CDHWRMX
szegõ/CDHWRMXY
szegelhetõ/CDHWRMX
szavahihetõ/CDHWRM
strapacipõ/CWMRymYcD
spurizõ/CDHWRMXY
sokrészû/CDHWRM
skubizõ/CDHWRMXY
sikeríttethetõ/CDHWRMX
serkedeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
sepertetõ/CDHWRMXY
semlegesítendõ/CDHWRMX
segítõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
sebeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
rücskös/BDGVNMT
röpíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
röhécselendõ/CDHWRMX
rézsû/CWMRmYcD
részesítõ/CDHWRMXY
rémüldözõ/CDHWRMXY
ráreppenõ/CDHWRMXY
rossznyelvû/CDHWRM
rezzegettetõ/CDHWRMXY
rezdíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
reteszelhetõ/CDHWRMX
repíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
rendû/CDHWRM
rendelõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
rekesztethetõ/CDHWRMX
rejtegettethetõ/CDHWRMX
recéztetõ/CDHWRMXY
rajtaüthetõ/CDHWRMX
pöszíthetõ/CDHWRMX
pörgõ/CDHWRMCDHMWXRY
pöfékeltethetõ/CDHWRMX
pólóütõ/CWMRymYcD
pukizendõ/CDHWRMX
pozõr/BDGVNMR
piszeghetõ/CDHWRMX
pingeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
pihenendõ/CDHWRMX
pettyezõ/CDHWRMXY
pergettetõ/CDHWRMXY
perdíthetõ/CDHWRMX
penderíthetõ/CDHWRMX
pedertetõ/CDHWRMXY
palafedõ/CWMRymYcD
okszerûsítõ/CDHWRMXY
növelendõ/CDHWRMX
nótáskönyv/CWMmTYcD
népesülõ/CDHWRMXY
négykerekû/CWMRymYcDCDHWRM
nyûvõdhetõ/CDHWRMX
nyomásmérõ/CWMRymYcD
nyerekedõ/CDHWRMXY
nyalizhetõ/CDHWRMX
nevetgéltetõ/CDHWRMXY
nemzendõ/CDHWRMX
nehezteltetõ/CDHWRMXY
nedvességmérõ/CWMRymYcD
nagylendületû/CWMRmYcD
mûveltetõ/CDHWRMXY
mézezõ/CDHWRMXY
mérlegelõ/CDHWRMXY
méretõ/CDHWRMXY
mélyíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
mályvaszínû/CDHWRM
minõsíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
mesélendõ/CDHWRMX
merészeltetõ/CDHWRMXY
meregettethetõ/CDHWRMX
mentegetõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
menekíthetõ/CDHWRMX
mellesedõ/CDHWRMXY
megérhetõ/CDHWRM
megsértõdött/BDGVNMR
megpapizendõ/CDHWRMX
megkettyinthetõ/CDHWRMX
meggyökeredztethetõ/CDHWRMX
megdicsõülhetõ/CDHWRMX
mailezõ/CDHWRMXY
lövöldözõ/CDHWRMXY
löttyentethetõ/CDHWRMX
lóversenyeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
lépkedõ/CDHWRMXY
lélegeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
légfürdõzhetõ/CDHWRMX
lokniztethetõ/CDHWRMX
lifteztetõ/CDHWRMXY
levéltetû/CWMRymYcD
levedztetõ/CDHWRMXY
leppegõ/CDHWRMXY
lengõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
lelkizõ/CDHWRMXYCDHWRM
leletezendõ/CDHWRMX
legöröghetõ/CDHWRMX
legelülsõ/CDHWRM
lefetyelendõ/CDHWRMX
lebzseltetõ/CDHWRMXY
küszöbölõ/CDHWRMXY
különböztettethetõ/CDHWRMX
közösíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
közvetítõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
köz/CWMmTYcD
követhetõ/CDHWRMX
kötöztethetõ/CDHWRMX
kötekedõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
köröztethetõ/CDHWRMX
körbeégõ/CDHWRMY
köpesztetendõ/CDHWRMX
könyvelendõ/CDHWRMX
költöztettetõ/CDHWRMXY
köhögtethetõ/CDHWRMX
kótyavetyélõ/CDHWRMXY
kímélõ/CDHWRMXY
kétértelmû/CDHWRM
kételkedõ/CDHWRMXY
késztettethetõ/CDHWRMX
kérõdzõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
kérelmezhetõ/CDHWRMX
kérdendõ/CDHWRMX
képesíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
kénytelenedendõ/CDHWRMX
kémleltetõ/CDHWRMXY
kégliztethetõ/CDHWRMX
kábszerezendõ/CDHWRMX
krakélereskedtethetõ/CDHWRMX
konfidenskedõ/CDHWRMXY
kiélhetõ/CDHWRM
kitûrõdõ/CDHWRMXY
kiserdõ/CWMRmYcD
kipörsentetõ/CDHWRMXY
kikötött/BDGVNMR
kifizetõdtethetõ/CDHWRMX
kicsinyíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
kiböngészõ/CDHWRMXY
kezdõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
keverhetõ/CDHWRMX
keskenyíttethetõ/CDHWRMX
kerülgettethetõ/CDHWRMX
keringethetõ/CDHWRMX
keresztelõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
kerekíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
kendõzendõ/CDHWRMX
kempingezhetõ/CDHWRMX
kellemkedtetõ/CDHWRMXY
kegyelmeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
kedvelõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
jövesztendõ/CDHWRMX
jésültetõ/CDHWRMXY
jelölõ/CWMRymYcDCDHWRMXY
jegyzõ/CDHMWXRY
ismerõs/CWMmTYcD
ingereltetõ/CDHWRMXY
ihletendõ/CDHWRMX
idegesíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
hörögõ/CDHWRMXY
hõbörögõ/CDHWRMXY
hátultöltõ/CWMRmYcD
hisztiztethetõ/CDHWRMX
hessentetõ/CDHWRMXY
hemzsegtethetõ/CDHWRMX
hegyeztetõ/CDHWRMXY
haszonbérelendõ/CDHWRMX
hagyományõrzõ/CWMRmYcD
görcsös/BDGVNMT
göcsörtös/BDGVNMT
gyüszmékelõ/CDHWRMXY
gyûjtögethetõ/CDHWRMX
gyökeredzhetõ/CDHWRMX
gyepesedõ/CDHWRMXY
gereblyéztethetõ/CDHWRMX
füstöltethetõ/CDHWRMX
függetlenítõ/CDHWRMXY
fölérõ/CDHWRMY
fõzendõ/CDHWRMX
fényesítendõ/CDHWRMX
fékeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
firniszezõ/CDHWRMXY
feszélyezendõ/CDHWRMX
fenyõerdõ/CWMRymYcD
felsérthetõ/CDHWRMCDHMWR
felfüggesztõdtetõ/CDHWRMXY
feledtetõ/CDHWRMXY
fejlesztõ/CDHWRMXY
fedeztettethetõ/CDHWRMX
ezermesterkedtetõ/CDHWRMXY
estethetõ/CDHWRMX
erõdíthetõ/CDHWRMX
eredeztettethetõ/CDHWRMX
engedélyeztethetõ/CDHWRMX
emelgettetõ/CDHWRMXY
eléterjeszthetõ/CDHWRMX
elsöprõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRM
elnincstelenedõ/CDHWRMXY
elkélhetõ/CDHWRMX
elerkölcstelenedendõ/CDHWRMX
ehetõ/CDHWRMXCDHWRM
egyetemesíttetõ/CDHWRMXY
edzendõ/CDHWRMX
dûtõ/CDHWRMXY
döngölendõ/CDHWRMX
döcögtethetõ/CDHWRMX
dumcsiztetõ/CDHWRMXY
derítõ/CDHWRMXY
céllövõ/CWMRymYcD
csörtetendõ/CDHWRMX
csömöszölõ/CDHWRMXY
csévélhetõ/CDHWRMX
csipdestethetõ/CDHWRMX
cserzõ/CDHMWXRY
csepegtetõ/CDHWRMXY
cseleztetõ/CDHWRMXY
cikizendõ/CDHWRMX
büntetõ/CWMRmYcDCDHWRMXY
böngésztethetõ/CDHWRMX
bõrözõ/CDHWRMXY
béleltethetõ/CDHWRMX
borseprõ/CWMRmYcD
biggyesztetõ/CDHWRMXY
beszemétkedtetõ/CDHWRMXY
belezhetõ/CDHWRMX
befõtt/CWMmRYcD
becserkészendõ/CDHWRMX
aprócseprõ/CDHWRM
aggófû/CWYcCWMRmYcD
Töttös/CWMT
Szûgy/CWMT
Révfülöp/CWMR
Nemeskûrt/CWMR
Magyarbükkös/CWMT
Kisürögd/CWMR
Jókõ/CWMR
Hagyárosbörönd/CWMR
Garamlök/CWMR
Erõmû/CWMR
Csög/CWMT
Bõs/CWMT
Balatonmáriafürdõ/CWMR
